South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S507.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Internal Revenue Code conformity SECTION 1.    Section 12-6-40(A)(1)(a) and (c) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (a) Except as otherwise provided, "Internal Revenue Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended through December 31, 2024, and includes the effective date provisions contained in it. (c) If Internal Revenue Code sections adopted by this State which expired or portions thereof expired on December 31, 2024, are extended, but otherwise not amended, by congressional enactment during 2025, these sections or portions thereof also are extended for South Carolina income tax purposes in the same manner that they are extended for federal income tax purposes. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 20th day of May, 2025. Approved the 22nd day of May, 2025. __________